Mississippi, session 2026, HB4123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jose Williams of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny on April 30, 1991, in Rankin County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve six (6) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and five (5) years probation. He was released on parole on August 15, 1991, due to expiration of sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.